Georgia, session 2025_26, HB887.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Patriots in Trades Act."
SECTION 2.
Chapter 14 of Title 41 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to electrical
contractors, plumbers, conditioned air contractors, low-voltage contractors, and utility
H. B. 887
- 1 -

LC 55 0618
contractors, is amended by revising Code Section 43-41-15, relating to certain military
certifications entitle persons to obtain certain professional licenses, as follows:
"43-14-15.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Discharge' means an honorable discharge or a general discharge from active military
service. Such term shall not mean a discharge under other than honorable conditions, a
bad conduct discharge, or a dishonorable discharge.
(2) 'Military' means the armed forces of the United States or a reserve component of the
armed forces of the United States, including the National Guard.
(b) A committee composed of the division director, members of the Governor's Office of
Workforce Development, and members of the No later than January 1, 2026, each division
of the board shall determine relevant divisions of the licensing board representing the
profession for which the applicant is seeking a license shall determine the military any
specialties or certifications obtainable in the military, the training, or experience, and
testing for which substantially meets or exceeds the requirements to obtain a any license
or certificate under this chapter except for any requirement that the necessary experience
or training be obtained under the employment or direction of a person licensed in this state.
for Electrical Contractor Class I, Journeyman Plumber, Conditioned Air Contractor Class
I, or Utility Foreman. The Governor shall designate a chairperson from among the
members of the committee Such specialties or certifications shall be compiled in a list that
is published on the public website of the Secretary of State. Beginning in calendar
year 2027, and at least annually thereafter, such divisions shall review such list and
determine whether revisions are needed, including, without limitation, whether any
additional such specialties or certifications shall be included on such list.
(c) Any current or former member of the military may apply to the licensing board for the
immediate issuance of a license or certification certificate under this chapter based upon
his or her having obtained a military specialty or certification during his or her service in
H. B. 887
- 2 -

LC 55 0618
the military, the training or experience for which substantially meets or exceeds the
requirements to obtain a license or certification that is identified in by the relevant division
of the board pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section as requiring training,
experience, and testing that meets or exceeds the requirements under this chapter to obtain
such license or certificate. In order to qualify for a license or certificate under this
subsection, an applicant shall make an application not later than two four years after his or
her discharge. The licensing board, in its discretion, may, by rule or regulation, extend
such two-year four-year period for a any license or certification, or class thereof, under this
chapter or may extend such two-year four-year period for an individual applicant if certain
circumstances, including, but not limited to, health, hospitalization, or other related
emergencies or exigencies, prevented the member of the military individual from making
an application within such time period. Such application shall be in such form and shall
require such documentation as the division director shall determine. If the applicant
satisfies the requirements of this Code section, the division director shall direct the
appropriate division of the board to issue the appropriate license or certificate, and the such
division of the board shall immediately issue such license or certificate; provided, however,
that the applicant shall satisfy all financial and insurance requirements for the issuance of
such license or certificate. This Code section shall only apply to the initial issuance of a
license or certificate under this chapter. After the initial issuance of a such license
certificate, the licensee individual holding such license or certificate shall be subject to any
provisions of this title relating to the renewal of the such license or certificate applicable
to all licensees."
SECTION 3.
Chapter 41 of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to residential and
commercial general contractors, is amended by revising Code Section 43-41-18, relating to
H. B. 887
- 3 -

LC 55 0618
certain military specialties or certifications entitle persons to obtain certain professional
licenses, as follows:
"43-41-18.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Discharge' means an honorable discharge or a general discharge from active military
service. Such term shall not mean a discharge under other than honorable conditions, a
bad conduct discharge, or a dishonorable discharge.
(2) 'Military' means the armed forces of the United States or a reserve component of the
armed forces of the United States, including the National Guard.
(b) A committee composed of the division director, members of the Governor's Office of
Workforce Development, and members of the licensing No later than January 1, 2026, the
board representing the profession of residential light-commercial contracting shall
determine the military any specialties or certifications obtainable in the military, the
training, experience, and testing for which substantially meet or exceed the requirements
to obtain a residential light-commercial contractor's any license under this chapter except
for any requirement that the necessary experience or training be obtained under the
employment or direction of a person licensed in this state. Such specialties or certifications
shall be compiled in a list that is published on the public website of the Secretary of State.
Beginning in calendar year 2027, and at least annually thereafter, the board shall review
such list and determine whether revisions are needed, including, without limitation,
whether any additional such specialties or certifications shall be included on such list. The
Governor shall designate a chairperson from among the membership of the committee.
(c) Any current or former member of the military may apply to the licensing board for the
immediate issuance of a license or certification under this chapter based upon his or her
having obtained a military specialty or certification during his or her service in the military
that is identified by the board pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section as requiring
training, experience, and testing that the training or experience for which substantially
H. B. 887
- 4 -

LC 55 0618
meets or exceeds the requirements to obtain a residential light-commercial contractor's such
license. In order to qualify for a license under this subsection, an applicant shall make an
application not later than 180 days four years after his or her discharge. The board, in its
discretion, may, by rule or regulation, extend such four-year period for any license under
this chapter or may extend such four-year period for an individual applicant if certain
100 circumstances, including, but not limited to, health, hospitalization, or other related
101 emergencies or exigencies prevented the individual from making an application within such
102 time period. Such application shall be in such form and shall require such documentation
103 as the division director shall determine. If the applicant satisfies the requirements of this
104 Code section, the division director shall direct the appropriate division of the board to issue
105 the license, and such division of the board shall immediately issue such license; provided,
106 however, that the applicant shall satisfy all financial and insurance requirements for the
107 issuance of such license. This Code section shall only apply to the initial issuance of a
108 license under this chapter. After the initial issuance of a license, the licensee shall be
109 subject to any provisions of this title relating to the renewal of the such license applicable
110 to all licensees."
111 SECTION 4.
112 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 887
- 5 -